Hawaii statutes.
PART I. GENERAL PROVISIONS

§329-1
Definitions. As used in this chapter:

"Abuse"
means the misuse of a substance or the use of a substance to an extent deemed
deleterious or detrimental to the user, to others, or to society.

"Address"
means, with respect to prescriptions, the physical location where an individual
resides such as:

(1) Street address, city,
and state;

(2) Tax map key number; or

(3) The description of a
physical location.

"Administer"
means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by injection,
inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or research
subject by:

(1) A practitioner (or, in
the practitioner's presence or at the practitioner's direction, by a licensed
or registered health care professional acting as the practitioner's authorized
agent), or

(2) The patient or
research subject at the direction or in the presence of the practitioner.

"Administrator"
means the administrator of the narcotics enforcement division of the department
of public safety.

"Advanced
practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority" means a person
licensed under section 457-8.6 who is registered under this chapter to
administer or prescribe a controlled substance; provided that an advanced
practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority shall not be authorized
to request, receive, or sign for professional controlled substance samples.

"Agent"
means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a
manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or
contract carrier, public warehouseman, or employee of the carrier or
warehouseman.

"Bureau"
or "DEA" means the Drug Enforcement Administration, United States
Department of Justice, or its successor agency.

"Central fill
pharmacy" means a pharmacy located in the State that is registered
pursuant to section 329-32 to prepare controlled substance orders for
dispensing to the ultimate user pursuant to a valid prescription transmitted to
it by a registered pharmacy.

"Central
repository" means a central repository established under section 329-102.

"Controlled
substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor in schedules I
through V of part II.

"Counterfeit
substance" means a controlled substance which, or the container or
labeling of which, without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or
other identifying mark, imprint, number or device, or any likeness thereof, of
a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other than the person who in fact
manufactured, distributed, or dispensed the substance.

"Deliver"
or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer
or sale from one person to another of a controlled substance or drug
paraphernalia, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

"Department"
means the department of public safety.

"Designated
member of the health care team" includes physician assistants, advanced
practice registered nurses, and covering physicians who are authorized under
state law to prescribe drugs.

"Designated
state agency" means the narcotics enforcement division, department of
public safety.

"Detoxification
treatment" means the dispensing, for a specific period of time, of a
narcotic drug or narcotic drugs in decreasing doses to an individual to
alleviate adverse physiological or psychological effects incident to withdrawal
from the continuous or sustained use of a narcotic drug and as a method of
bringing the individual to a narcotic drug-free state within a specified period
of time. There are two types of detoxification treatments: short-term
detoxification treatment and long-term detoxification treatment;

(1) Short-term
detoxification treatment is for a period not in excess of thirty days; and

(2) Long-term
detoxification treatment is for a period more than thirty days but not in
excess of one hundred eighty days.

"Dispense"
means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate user or research subject
by or pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the
administering of a practitioner's controlled substances, and packaging,
labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery.
A controlled substance is dispensed when:

(1) It is compounded,
prepared, labeled, and packaged pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner
by a licensed pharmacist acting in the usual course of the licensed
pharmacist's professional practice and who is either registered individually or
employed in a registered pharmacy or by a registered institutional
practitioner, for delivery to the ultimate user;

(2) It is compounded,
prepared, labeled and packaged for delivery to the ultimate user by a
practitioner acting in the usual course of the practitioner's professional
practice;

(3) It is prepared,
labeled, and packaged pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner by a
registered health care professional acting as an agent of the practitioner for
delivery to the ultimate user by the practitioner; or

(4) It is prepackaged by a
pharmacist for use in an emergency facility for delivery to the ultimate user
by a licensed or registered health care professional pursuant to the order of a
physician.

"Dispenser"
means a practitioner who dispenses.

"Distribute"
means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled
substance.

"Distributor"
means a person who distributes.

"Drug"
means:

(1) Substances recognized
as drugs in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic
Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National Formulary, or any
supplement to any of them;

(2) Substances intended
for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease
in man or animals;

(3) Substances (other than
food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man or
animals; and

(4) Substances intended
for use as a component of any article specified in clause (1), (2), or (3) of
this subsection. It does not include devices or their components, parts, or
accessories.

"Drug
Enforcement Administration registration number" means the practitioner's
Drug Enforcement Administration controlled substance registration number.

"Drug
paraphernalia" means all equipment, products, and materials of any kind
which are used, primarily intended for use, or primarily designed for use, in
planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing,
compounding, converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing,
packaging, repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting,
inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body a controlled substance
in violation of this chapter. It includes but is not limited to:

(1) Kits used, primarily
intended for use, or primarily designed for use in planting, propagating,
cultivating, growing, or harvesting of any species of plant which is a
controlled substance or from which a prohibited controlled substance can be
derived;

(2) Kits used, primarily
intended for use, or primarily designed for use in manufacturing, compounding,
converting, producing, processing, or preparing prohibited controlled
substances;

(3) Isomerization devices
used, primarily intended for use, or primarily designed for use in increasing
the potency of any species of plant which is a prohibited controlled substance;

(4) Testing equipment
used, primarily intended for use, or primarily designed for use in identifying,
or in analyzing the strength, effectiveness, or purity of prohibited controlled
substances;

(5) Scales and balances
used, primarily intended for use, or primarily designed for use in weighing or
measuring prohibited controlled substances;

(6) Diluents and
adulterants; such as quinine hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite, dextrose, and
lactose, used, primarily intended for use, or primarily designed for use in
cutting prohibited controlled substances;

(7) Separation gins and
sifters used, primarily intended for use, or primarily designed for use in
removing twigs and seeds from, or in otherwise cleaning or refining, prohibited
marijuana;

(8) Blenders, bowls,
containers, spoons, and mixing devices used, primarily intended for use, or
primarily designed for use in compounding prohibited controlled substances;

(9) Capsules, balloons,
envelopes, and other containers used, primarily intended for use, or primarily
designed for use in packaging small quantities of prohibited controlled
substances;

(10) Containers and other
objects used, primarily intended for use, or primarily designed for use in
storing or concealing prohibited controlled substances;

(11) Hypodermic syringes,
needles, and other objects used, primarily intended for use, or primarily
designed for use in parenterally injecting prohibited controlled substances
into the human body;

(12) Objects used,
primarily intended for use, or primarily designed for use in ingesting,
inhaling, or otherwise introducing prohibited marijuana, cocaine, hashish,
hashish oil, or methamphetamine into the human body, such as:

(A) Metal, wooden,
acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic pipes with or without screens,
permanent screens, hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls;

(B) Water pipes;

(C) Carburetion
tubes and devices;

(D) Smoking and
carburetion masks;

(E) Roach clips:
meaning objects used to hold burning materials, such as marijuana cigarettes,
that have become too small or too short to be held in the hand;

(F) Miniature
cocaine spoons, and cocaine vials;

(G) Chamber pipes;

(H) Carburetor
pipes;

(I) Electric
pipes;

(J) Air-driven
pipes;

(K) Chillums;

(L) Bongs; and

(M) Ice pipes or
chillers.

In determining
whether an object is drug paraphernalia, a court or other authority should
consider, in addition to all other logically relevant factors, the following:

(1) Statements by an owner
or by anyone in control of the object concerning its use;

(2) Prior convictions, if
any, of an owner, or of anyone in control of the object, under any state or
federal law relating to any controlled substance;

(3) The proximity of the
object, in time and space, to a direct violation of this chapter;

(4) The proximity of the
object to controlled substances;

(5) The existence of any
residue of controlled substances on the object;

(6) Direct or
circumstantial evidence of the intent of an owner, or of anyone in control of
the object, to deliver it to a person or persons whom the owner or person in
control knows, or should reasonably know, intend to use the object to
facilitate a violation of this chapter; the innocence of an owner, or of anyone
in control of the object, as to a direct violation of this chapter shall not
prevent a finding that the object is intended for use, or designed for use as
drug paraphernalia;

(7) Instructions, oral or
written, provided with the object concerning its use;

(8) Descriptive materials
accompanying the object which explain or depict its use;

(9) National and local
advertising concerning its use;

(10) The manner in which
the object is displayed for sale;

(11) Whether the owner, or
anyone in control of the object, is a legitimate supplier of like or related
items to the community, such as a licensed distributor or dealer of tobacco
products;

(12) Direct or
circumstantial evidence of the ratio of sales of the object or objects to the
total sales of the business enterprise;

(13) The existence and
scope of legitimate uses for the object in the community; and

(14) Expert testimony
concerning its use.

"Electronic
prescription" means a prescription that is generated on an electronic
prescription application and transmitted as an electronic data file that
complies with all applicable requirements of title 21 Code of Federal
Regulations part 1311 and any additional rules adopted by the department.

"Electronic
prescription application" means electronic prescription software either as
a stand-alone application or as a module in an electronic health record
application.

"Electronic
signature" means a method of signing an electronic message that identifies
a particular person as the source of the message and indicates the person's
approval of the information contained in the message.

"Ephedrine"
includes any synthetic compound, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation
extracted from the plant (genus) Ephedra that contains the substance ephedrine.

"Exception
report" means an output of data indicating schedule II controlled
substances dispensation that is outside expected norms for a practitioner
practicing a particular specialty or field of health care, for a dispenser
doing business in a particular location, or for a patient.

"Identification
number" means, with respect to a patient:

(1) The patient's unique
valid driver's license number or state identification card number, followed by
the abbreviation of the state issuing the driver's license or state
identification card, or the patient's military identification number;

(2) If the patient is a foreign patient, the
patient's passport number;

(3) If the patient does not have a valid
driver's license, state identification card, or military identification, the
patient's social security number;

(4) If the patient is less than eighteen
years of age and has none of the identification referred to in paragraph (1),
(2), or (3), the unique number on the valid driver's license, state
identification card, military identification, or passport of the patient's
parent or guardian; or

(5) If the controlled
substance is obtained for an animal, the unique number of the animal's owner as
described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3).

"Immediate
precursor" means a substance which the department of public safety has
found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly
used or produced primarily for use, and which is an immediate chemical
intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled
substance, the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit
manufacture.

"Locum tenens
practitioner" means a practitioner who is licensed in this State and who
temporarily substitutes for another practitioner for a period not to exceed
sixty days at that other practitioner's registered place of business. Locum
tenens practitioners are not eligible to receive an oral code number as
designated by section 328-16(k).

"Maintenance treatment" means the dispensing of a narcotic
drug in the treatment of an individual for dependence upon heroin or other
morphine-like drug, for a period in excess of twenty-one days.

"Manufacture"
means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or
processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by
extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of
chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis,
and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or
relabeling of its container, except that this term does not include the
preparation or compounding of a controlled substance by an individual for the
individual's own use or the preparation, compounding, packaging, or labeling of
a controlled substance:

(1) By a practitioner as
an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled
substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice, or

(2) By a practitioner, or
by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision,
for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical
analysis and not for sale.

"Marijuana"
means all parts of the plant (genus) Cannabis whether growing or not; the seeds
thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds,
or resin. It does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced
from the stalks, oil, or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other
compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature
stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the
sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination.

"Narcotic
drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly
by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of
chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(1) Opium and opiate, and
any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate.

(2) Any salt, compound,
isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or
identical with any of the substances referred to in clause (1), but not
including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

(3) Opium poppy and poppy
straw.

(4) Coca leaves and any
salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves, and any salt,
compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically
equivalent or identical with any of these substances, but not including
decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca leaves which do not contain cocaine
or ecgonine.

"Opiate"
means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having
addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. It does not include,
unless specifically designated as controlled under section 329-11, the
dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts
(dextromethorphan). It does include its racemic and levorotatory forms.

"Opium
poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum, except its
seeds.

"Person"
means individual, corporation, government, or governmental subdivision or
agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other
legal entity.

"Pharmacist"
means a person who is licensed or holds a permit under chapter 461 to practice
pharmacy, including a pharmacy intern who is under the immediate and direct
supervision of a licensed pharmacist.

"Pharmacy
delegate" means an individual employed by the pharmacy and selected by the
pharmacist to act as that pharmacist's agent to whom the pharmacist has
delegated the task of accessing electronic prescription accountability system
information and for whose actions the pharmacist takes full responsibility.

"Physician
assistant" means a person licensed under section 453-5.3, who is
registered under this chapter to administer, prescribe, or dispense a
controlled substance under the authority and supervision of a physician
registered under section 329-33, but who is not authorized to request, receive,
or sign for professional controlled substance samples.

"Physician-patient
relationship" means the collaborative relationship between physicians and
their patients. To establish this relationship, the treating physician or the
physician's designated member of the health care team, at a minimum shall:

(1) Personally perform a
face-to-face history and physical examination of the patient that is
appropriate to the specialty training and experience of the physician or the
designated member of the physician's health care team, make a diagnosis and
formulate a therapeutic plan, or personally treat a specific injury or
condition;

(2) Discuss with the
patient the diagnosis or treatment, including the benefits of other treatment
options; and

(3) Ensure the
availability of appropriate follow-up care.

"Poppy
straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after
mowing.

"Practitioner"
means:

(1) A physician, dentist,
veterinarian, scientific investigator, or other person licensed and registered
under section 329-32 to distribute, dispense, or conduct research with respect
to a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in
this State;

(2) An advanced practice
registered nurse with prescriptive authority licensed and registered under
section 329-32 to prescribe and administer controlled substances in the course
of professional practice in this State; and

(3) A pharmacy, hospital,
or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to
distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a
controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this
State.

"Practitioner
delegate" means an agent or employee of a practitioner (physician,
dentist, veterinarian, advanced practice registered nurse with prescriptive
authority, or physician assistant) to whom the practitioner has delegated the
task of accessing electronic prescription accountability system information and
for whose actions the practitioner takes full responsibility.

"Prescribe"
means to direct, designate, or order the use of a formula for the preparation
of a medicine for a disease or illness and the manner of using them.

"Prescriber"
means one who is authorized to issue a prescription.

"Prescription"
means an order for medication, which is dispensed to or for an ultimate user.
"Prescription" shall not include an order for medication that is
dispensed for immediate administration to the ultimate user, such as a chart
order to dispense a drug to a bed patient for immediate administration in a
hospital.

"Production"
includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing, or harvesting of a
controlled substance.

"Reverse
distributor" means a registrant who is registered under section 329-32 to
receive controlled substances acquired from another state certified controlled
substance registrant pursuant to title 21 Code of Federal Regulations part
1317, for the purpose of:

(1) Returning unwanted,
unusable, or outdated controlled substances to the manufacturer or the
manufacturer's agent; or

(2) Where necessary,
processing such substances or arranging for the processing of such substances
for disposal as authorized by the administrator.

"State",
when applied to a part of the United States, includes any state, district,
commonwealth, territory, insular possession thereof, and any area subject to
the legal authority of the United States of America.

"Supervising
physician" means a physician licensed to practice medicine in the State
and registered under section 329-33, who supervises a physician assistant and
retains full professional and legal responsibility for the performance of the
supervised physician assistant and the care and treatment of the patient.

"System"
means an electronic prescription accountability system as described in part
VIII.

"Ultimate
user" means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the
person's own use or for the use of a member of the person's household or for
administering to an animal owned by the person or by a member of the person's
household. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 163, §7; gen ch 1985; am L
1986, c 214, §1; am L 1988, c 259, §1; am L 1989, c 293, §1; am L 1990, c 13,
§1 and c 281, §§4, 10; am L 1991, c 159, §§3 to 6; am L 1996, c 268, §4; am L
1999, c 90, §1 and c 252, §1; am L 2001, c 203, §1; am L 2004, c 44, §4; am L
2006, c 69, §2; am L 2008, c 186, §2; am L 2009, c 169, §6; am L 2010, c 57, §3;
am L 2013, c 20, §2; am L 2016, c 218, §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Marijuana Prohibition in Hawaii,
Steven K. Christensen, 13 HBJ No. 3 Fall 1977, pg. 9.

Case Notes

In prosecution under §329-43.5(b),
trial court should provide jury with an instruction enumerating all fourteen
factors listed in statutory definition of drug paraphernalia. 75 H. 80, 856
P.2d 1246.

No error in court failing to
dismiss count against defendant for possessing "everyday household items
not intended or designed for use as drug paraphernalia" as broad
definition of drug paraphernalia and multiple examples of such contraband
enumerated in this section weighed against defendant's contention that the
ordinary nature of the containers defendant possessed did not involve the harm
or evil sought to be avoided under §329-43.5 or amounted to extenuations that
would not have been envisioned by the legislature. 98 H. 196, 46 P.3d 498.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next